Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,118.04
Medical review of applicant or licensee; legislative intent.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) The operation of a motor vehicle on the highways of the state is a privilege and that no person should operate a motor vehicle on the highways of this state if not physically or mentally capable of safely doing so;

(2) The approval or denial of an application for an operator's license or the revocation of an operator's license may provide or prevent an opportunity for the applicant or licensee to obtain or maintain gainful employment; and

(3) Under certain circumstances, careful medical review and evaluation of an applicant for an operator's license or of a licensee is necessary to protect the interest of the applicant or licensee and the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

Laws 1994, LB 211, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 60-4,118.01;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 59.
July 18, 2026